Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-735.02
Election of trustees; certification of results.

For any sanitary and improvement district, the county clerk or election commissioner shall certify the results of the election to the district.

Laws 1976, LB 313, § 16;

Laws 1977, LB 228, § 3;

Laws 1982, LB 359, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 483, § 2;

Laws 1987, LB 652, § 6.